Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 9. Distributions.

Sec. 10.50.290.
Repayment of contribution and sharing of profits and other assets.

Subject to AS

10.50.305

—

10.50.320

, and unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement of the company, a member of a limited liability company shall be repaid the member’s contribution to capital and shares equally in the profits and other assets of the company remaining after all liabilities, including liabilities to members, are satisfied.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.295.
Interim distributions under operating agreement.

Subject to AS

10.50.305

—

10.50.320

, if a limited liability company makes an interim distribution of its assets to its members, the company shall make the distribution to the members in the manner provided in an operating agreement of the company. The operating agreement of the company may authorize different interim distributions for different classes of members.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.300.
Interim distributions without operating agreement.

Subject to AS

10.50.305

—

10.50.320

, if an operating agreement of the company does not provide for the interim distribution of the assets of the company, when a limited liability company makes an interim distribution of its assets, the interim distributions to each member of the company shall be equal.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.305.
Restrictions on distributions.

A distribution may not be made by a limited liability company if, after giving effect to the distribution,

the company would not be able to pay its debts as they become due in the usual course of conducting its affairs; or

the limited liability company’s assets would be less than the sum of its liabilities plus, unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement, the amount that would be needed, if the limited liability company were to be dissolved at the time of the distribution, to satisfy the preferential rights of other members upon dissolution that are superior to the rights of the member receiving the distribution.

A limited liability company may base a determination that a distribution is not prohibited under (a) of this section on

financial statements prepared on the basis of accounting practices and principles that are reasonable under the circumstances; or

a fair valuation or other method that is reasonable under the circumstances.

Except as provided in (e) of this section, the effect of a distribution in accordance with (a) of this section is measured as of the date

the distribution is authorized if the payment occurs within 120 days after the date of authorization; or

payment is made if the payment occurs more than 120 days after the date of authorization.

If the terms of an indebtedness provide that payment of principal and interest is to be made only if and to the extent that payment of a distribution to members could then be made under this section, indebtedness of a limited liability company, including indebtedness issued as a distribution, is not a liability for purposes of determinations made under (b) of this section.

If indebtedness is issued as a distribution, each payment of principal or interest on the indebtedness is treated as a distribution, and the effect of the distribution is measured on the date the payment is actually made.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.315.
Additional restrictions in articles or agreement.

Nothing in this chapter prohibits additional restrictions upon the purchase or redemption of a company’s own limited liability company interests by provision in the articles of organization or operating agreement of the limited liability company or in another agreement entered into by the company.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.320.
Liability of members receiving prohibited distributions; suit against members.

A member of a limited liability company who receives a distribution prohibited by this chapter with knowledge of facts indicating the impropriety of the distribution is liable to the company for the benefit of all of the creditors or members entitled to institute an action under (b) of this section for the amount received by the member with interest at the legal rate on judgments until paid. The liability of the member under this subsection may not exceed the liabilities of the company owed to nonconsenting creditors at the time of the violation and the injury suffered by nonconsenting members.

Suit may be brought in the name of the company to enforce the liability to

creditors arising under (a) of this section for a violation of AS

10.50.305

against any or all members liable by any one or more creditors of the company whose debts or claims arose before the time of the distribution to members and who have not consented to the distribution, whether or not they have reduced their claims to judgment; or

members arising under (a) of this section for a violation of AS

10.50.305

against any or all members liable by any one or more members holding preferred limited liability company interests outstanding at the time of the distribution who have not consented to the distribution, without regard to the provisions of AS

10.50.735

.

A member sued under this section may compel contribution from all other members liable under this section.

This section does not affect the liability that a member may have under other applicable law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.330.
Time for interim distributions.

A member of a limited liability company is entitled to receive interim distributions under AS

10.50.295

—

10.50.300

at the times or upon the happening of the events specified in an operating agreement of the company, or at the times determined by the members or managers under AS

10.50.150

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.335.
Distributions when a person ceases to be a member. [Repealed, § 23 ch 78 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 10.50.340.
Distribution in kind.

Unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement of the company, a member, regardless of the nature of the member’s contribution, may not demand and receive a distribution from a limited liability company in a form other than cash.

Unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement of the company, a limited liability company may not compel a member of the company to accept from the company a distribution of a company asset in a form other than cash to the extent that the percentage of the asset distributed to the member exceeds the percentage that the member would have shared in a cash distribution equal to the value of the asset at the time of distribution.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.345.
Right to distribution.

When a member of a limited liability company is entitled to receive a distribution from the company, the member is a creditor of the company with respect to the distribution, and is entitled to all remedies available to a creditor of the company.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.348.
Inapplicability to winding up and dissolution.

AS

10.50.290

—

10.50.340

do not apply in a proceeding for winding up and dissolution of a limited liability company.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)